Utah statutes.
41-6a-1502.   Motorcycles, motor-driven cycles, or all-terrain type I vehicles -- Operation on public highways.

(1) (a)  A motorcycle or a motor-driven cycle is entitled to full use of a lane.

(b)  A person may not operate a  motor vehicle in a manner that deprives a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle of the full use of a lane.

(c)  This Subsection (1) does not apply to motorcycles or motor-driven cycles operated two abreast in a single lane.

(2)  The operator of a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle may not overtake and pass in the same lane occupied by the vehicle being overtaken.

(3) A person may not operate a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle between:

(a)  lanes of traffic; or

(b)  adjacent lines or rows of vehicles.

(4)  Motorcycles or motor-driven cycles may not be operated more than two abreast in a single lane.

(5)  Subsections (2) and (3) do not apply to peace officers acting in the peace officers' official capacities.

(6)  The provisions of this section also apply to all-terrain type I vehicles.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 2, 2005 General Session

